af_ZA/af_ZA.aff
# af_ZA.aff - Afrikaans (af) affix file for use in hunspell
#
# Copyright (C) 2019 Kris van der Merwe
# ... created from the Afrikaans ispell affix file by Dwayne Bailey
# ... created from the Afrikaans ispell affix file by Reinier de Vos
#
# This library is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# This library is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this library; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA 02111-1307 USA
#

# This Afrikaans dictionary is maintained on Puzzlefoundry.com
# It is possible to edit dictionaries through the Puzzlefoundry.com interface
# Your improvements will then be included in future releases.
#
# Die Afrikaanse speltoets data word op PuzzleFoundry.com instandgehou en geproduseer
# Dit is moontlik om PuzzleFoundry.com woordeboeke direk op die web te wysig.
# In so geval word woordeboek-redigeervermoë aan u toegestaan.
# Ek (Kris) kan ook gekontak word deur die PuzzleFoundry.com kontak bladsy
#

SET UTF-8

TRY eraisontlgkdumpbvwhfyjëêc-ï'zxöéôqSBVOKGATDPMHRWLIENUFJCXZèûâüä

#NOSPLITSUGS


# ordinale nommers 1ste, 2de, 3de, 4de, 5de ... 20ste ...
COMPOUNDMIN 1
ONLYINCOMPOUND c
# nommer verbuiging reëls:
#   ([23456789]|1?[0-9])de
#   ([018]?|[2-9][0-9]+|[1-9]{3,})ste
#
# COMPOUNDRULE het foute, eenvoudige reëls word dus gebruik

COMPOUNDRULE 4
COMPOUNDRULE 1np
COMPOUNDRULE qp
COMPOUNDRULE mn*t
COMPOUNDRULE nnn*t

WORDCHARS 0123456789

# Certain characters are considered "close" to others
#
# Sommige karakters word geag om "naby" ander karakters te wees
#

MAP 6
MAP aâäáà
MAP eêëéè
MAP iîïíì
MAP oôöóò
MAP uûüúù
MAP yÿý

# We want to suggest certain replacements to the checker with our
# knowledge of what can easily be mixed up.
#
# Ons wil sekere plaasvervangings voorstel aan die toetser met ons
# kennis van wat maklik verwar word.
#
# Byvoorbeeld:
#   g<->ch, vir foute soos gemikus of nongalant
#   y<->ui<->ei, uu<->ie, vir oorronding en ontronding, en y/ei-verwarring
#   ij -> y, lijk -> lik, vir foutiewe Nederlandse spellings
#   kuste -> ci, kuste -> kusse, vir politikuste -> politici/politikusse
#   ui oeï, vir foute soos Hinduisme -> Hindoeïsme
#   ch->tj, sh -> sj, vir foute soos chips (tjips) en shoe (sjoe)
#
REP 27
REP g ch
REP ei y
REP y ei
REP y ui
REP ui y
REP ei ui
REP ui ei
REP ij y
REP lijk lik
REP uu ie
REP ie uu
REP f v
REP v f
REP d t
REP t d
REP kuste ci
REP kuste kusse
REP x ks
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP ui oeï
REP ch tj
REP sh sj
REP kie djie
REP kie tjie
REP ntjie nkie
REP aaitjie aadjie

# Conjugation rules
# Woord verbuiging reëls
#


PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 aan .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 be .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C 0 in .

SFX E N 2
SFX E 0 e  [^aeiou]
SFX E 0 'e [ghc]e

PFX F Y 1
PFX F 0 af .

PFX G Y 1
PFX G 0 ge .

SFX H N 1
SFX H   0 heid .

SFX J N 16
SFX J   0  tjie   .[aeiouy]
SFX J   0  tjies  .[aeiouy]
SFX J   0  tjie   .[aeiouyëê][lnr]
SFX J   0  tjies  .[aeiouyëê][lnr]
SFX J   0  etjie   ^.{1,3}[aeiouyëê]ng
SFX J   0  etjies  ^.{1,3}[aeiouyëê]ng
SFX J   0  pie    .[aeiou]m
SFX J   0  pies   .[aeiou]m
SFX J   0  jie    .[aeioun](d|t)
SFX J   0  jies   .[aeioun](d|t)
SFX J   0  'tjies .+[^aeiouyëêlngrmdtp]
SFX J   0  'tjie  .+[^aeiouyëêlngrmdtp]
SFX J   0  'etjies ^[flmnrsx]
SFX J   0  'etjie  ^[flmnrsx]
SFX J   0  'tjies ^[^flmnrsx]
SFX J   0  'tjie  ^[^flmnrsx]

PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0 op .

SFX L N 1
SFX L   0 te .

PFX M Y 1
PFX M 0 oor .

SFX N N 1
SFX N   0 de .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O 0 on .

SFX P N 31
SFX P   ad de aad
SFX P   ag e aag
SFX P   ak ke aak
SFX P   al le aal
SFX P   am me aam
SFX P   an ne aan
SFX P   ap pe aap
SFX P   ar re aar
SFX P   as se aas
SFX P   at te aat
SFX P   ed de eed
SFX P   eg ge eeg
SFX P   ek ke eek
SFX P   el le eel
SFX P   em me eem
SFX P   en ne een
SFX P   ep pe eep
SFX P   er re eer
SFX P   es se ees
SFX P   et te eet
SFX P   od de ood
SFX P   og ë  oog
SFX P   ok ke ook
SFX P   ol le ool
SFX P   om me oom
SFX P   on ne oon
SFX P   op pe oop
SFX P   or re oor
SFX P   ot te oot
SFX P   un ne uun
SFX P   ur re uur

SFX S N 2
SFX S   0 s  [^saiou]
SFX S   0 's [^aeiou][aiou]

SFX T N 1
SFX T   0 ste .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 uit .

PFX V Y 1
PFX V 0 ver .

SFX Z N 8
SFX Z   af we aaf
SFX Z   f  we eef
SFX Z   f  we ief
SFX Z   f  we oef
SFX Z   of we oof
SFX Z   f  we uif
SFX Z   f  we yf
SFX Z   id de heid

SFX d N 2
SFX d 0 nd ..[ëe]
SFX d 0 nde ..[ëe]

SFX g N 2
SFX g 0 ing .[dgiklmnprstu]
SFX g 0 inge .[dgiklmnprstu]

SFX h N 2
SFX h 0 ing .[dgiklmnprstu]
SFX h 0 ings .[dgiklmnprstu]

SFX r N 1
SFX r   0 er ...
