af_ZA/af_ZA.dic
aanrand/hr
aanspoel/g
aanstootlik/HTr
aanvaarbaar/HT
aanvangstarief/Z
advertensie/S
afbrand/h
afdreig/gh
afgehandel/O
afgekort/E
afgeperk/L
afgeskryf/Z
afgestuur/N
afskeur/h
afvloei/h
afwesig/H
aktief/TZ
aktueel/PT
alba/T
analis/L
apaties/E
appliseer/G
arbeidsburo/S
baal/GJV
bakke/d
ban/UV
bandsaag/P
banktarief/Z
barmhartig/HTr
beantwoorde/O
bedel/FGgh
bederflik/HO
bedrieglik/HOTr
bedrywigheid/MP
bedwelm/Nh
beelde/Vd
begeester/Ng
behoeftepeiling/S
bekendes/O
bekerwedstryd/E
bekkig/ETr
bekommer/g
beleidsaspek/L
belemmer/Ogh
belig/M
benader/Ngh
bepeins/Ng
bereid/HOgr
bereken/Ngh
bergagtig/EH
berispe/d
besig/GHTr
besigtig/gh
besteding/AMU
bestendige/OS
bestorm/ghr
bestryk/gh
betitel/N
betreurenswaardig/EHTr
bevryde/Sd
bewapen/Ngh
bewe/Gd
bewillig/Ngh
bewindsverandering/ES
bidsters/A
bindend/V
bioskoop/P
blaser/AKM
blikkerig/H
blinddoek/E
blinker/JU
blinkvryf/Z
bloeiende/K
blou/HJLTr
blouwildebees/L
bly/ACEHKMUVr
boomspesie/S
bouers/FV
bousels/A
braaipanne/J
brandstig/G
brei/AKMUr
brief/MZ
briese/d
briesend/Tr
brou/BCr
bruikbaarder/O
bruinarend/E
brul/U
buigingsvorm/V
burgerplig/L
byvoeg/h
chevron/S
chronograaf/Z
daeraad/P
danig/EH
deel/CFJKMU
dekking/BFM
dekkings/B
delegeer/N
deling/CFKMUV
delings/CFV
denke/d
deps/G
destruktief/Z
diep/EKLTU
diminutief/Z
diploma/JL
distribusiekromme/S
diékant/T
dodelik/EHTr
doelgerig/L
donder/BFKMU
dorie/G
dou/BGJ
dra/ABCFKMNUV
draad/BCFJM
draag/CV
draaibord/U
draaier/SV
draaierig/EH
drag/BKMV
drome/d
drywende/M
drywing/ABFKMUV
dui/ABL
duisendskoon/P
dweil/EGK
dwingeland/E
eerbaarder/O
eersaam/HP
effektief/OTZ
eier/JS
eis/EMr
embolie/S
end/F
enig/HTr
enkel/HSg
erd/AKV
etteragtig/EH
evokatief/Z
fagot/L
faseer/CU
fileer/G
fisiokraat/P
flappe/d
flapper/GJU
fluks/CHr
fors/EHTr
fretboor/J
fungeer/G
gaande/ACFKUV
gange/CMU
gansie/S
gaping/AES
geadministreer/N
geanaliseerde/O
gebeurlik/EH
geblansjeer/N
geblom/OU
gebly/ACFKMU
gebrei/AKU
gebuigde/CKU
gebyt/CFU
gedek/LM
gedekonsentreer/N
gedink/C
gedresseer/N
gedun/FU
gedurf/AL
gefrommel/KN
gegeneer/O
gegraaf/Z
gehanteer/N
gehardloop/ACFU
gehel/CFM
gehou/ACFKMU
geil/HLTr
gejaag/ACFKMU
geklink/ACFKM
geklouter/CFKU
geknipte/AU
gekombineer/N
gekoop/ACKU
gekwoteer/N
gelaat/CFMU
gelede/O
gelewe/CKMU
gelig/FKU
gelyke/OSd
gemanierde/O
gemeng/CHO
gemerk/AKMU
geneem/ACFKMU
geneutraliseer/N
gepak/AFKMU
gepasteuriseerde/O
gepers/CFKLU
geprik/K
geprojekteer/N
geraffineerd/H
gerand/AF
gereent/CU
geroei/ACKU
geruis/A
gesertifiseerde/O
gesimuleer/N
geskep/KMU
geskets/CFU
geskeur/CFKU
geskud/FKU
geskyn/C
gesloof/Z
gesnel/AF
gesnyde/CFKOSU
gesofistikeerd/EOTr
gespoorde/A
gesprinkel/CM
gestel/ACFKU
gestempel/FO
gestuur/ACKMU
gesuigde/CKU
gesuiwer/AOU
geswel/AKMU
geswem/ACMU
geteiken/N
getekende/AFO
getrek/FM
gevang/AFKU
geveg/LU
gevlieg/ACFKMU
gevra/ACFKMOU
gewaag/NPT
gewelddadig/EHTr
gewer/AF
gewettigde/O
gewikkel/AU
gewild/HT
gewurg/CF
geïmpliseer/N
gierig/CH
gieter/SV
gieting/FMUV
gifkanne/J
giftiger/BV
goudkleurig/EH
goudlening/S
grens/AG
griewe/d
groei/KLMUr
groenerig/EH
grondves/GL
grusaam/HPT
haar/BFJNPV
haartange/J
haper/Ggh
harde/V
hardhorig/EH
harpenaar/PS
hars/Eh
heersers/BM
hegsel/A
hekkie/S
heradresseer/N
herberg/EG
heroïes/O
hidrolise/r
hoepel/JS
hoeveelheidslys/L
hoofwoord/E
hore/AVd
hoë/SV
huislik/HO
huldig/C
huur/CU
ikonograaf/Z
inboorlingtaal/P
ingeplak/L
inhou/N
inkom/T
inkwisiteur/S
inplant/h
insend/gh
instuif/Z
intiem/HTr
isolasionisties/E
jagte/d
jil/G
jongste/JS
kabaretarties/L
kap/ABCFKUVhr
kaparrang/S
kapasiteit/CEM
karre/J
kastaiingboom/P
kateteriseer/G
keerder/B
kenter/Ggh
kerkering/C
kiemkragtig/E
klaag/AUV
klaer/AV
klein/EHJLSTr
klep/G
klewerig/EHr
klimming/BFK
knae/d
kneg/GLSV
kners/Ggh
kneukel/SV
knoes/GL
koeler/FV
koelerig/EH
kommando/JS
kompetensie/C
konjunktief/Z
konkel/FMV
konkurreer/G
konsument/E
koorsblaar/P
koring/BG
kraffie/S
krokodille/r
kruip/ABCFKMU
kruis/EKMghr
kruislaagband/M
kry/ACFKMUV
kundige/O
kunsproduk/L
kwar/JL
kwarts/E
kwint/EU
kyker/CMUV
laag/BHKT
lak/Gr
lamsakkig/EHTr
land/AEJgh
legstuk/C
leiding/ACFKMV
lemming/S
lesingsaal/P
lewe/BCJKMSd
lewer/CSUgh
lief/BHNST
liggelowig/EH
ligpunt/EJ
ligters/KV
linie/Sr
logogrief/Z
loopplek/AC
looptyd/C
loper/JMU
lornjet/L
lossing/CEFKV
lyn/ABCEFJK
lê/ABCFKMUV
maker/ABCFKV
malawiër/S
materiaal/P
medelyde/d
mediamens/E
meerdoelig/ETr
meid/EJ
menslik/HTV
met/Lgh
mineer/G
molestasie/S
mos/B
mou/M
naar/HJT
naelskêr/J
naeltjieboom/P
naja/Nr
neembare/AFOUV
neig/gh
nimfagtig/E
nul/B
nuttig/GHOT
nuusbrief/Z
nuut/HJKST
okulasie/CS
ombou/h
omgestamp/L
omhein/Nh
omskrywe/d
onaangenaam/HTV
onberispelik/H
onderhandel/gh
onderkruip/r
onderwysamptenaar/P
ongerymd/EHS
onsimpatiek/H
ontnugter/Ng
ontvanklik/HOTr
ontvet/L
ontvries/N
ontwikkel/gh
onwellewend/EH
oorgroot/J
oorweldig/r
opgesnuif/Z
opgrawing/ES
ophop/h
oplope/d
opmerk/gh
opsetlike/O
otoskoop/P
ovuleer/G
paapsgesind/EH
pagter/V
pak/ACFKLMU
pastei/J
peins/Ghr
persfotograaf/Z
pet/L
peul/EFU
ploeg/CMU
ploegskaar/P
pluim/BEJ
posbeampte/S
posteer/G
pot/CJKL
potent/ETr
pronkerig/ETr
pryswaardig/E
pêrel/GJS
rafel/FJSU
rassuiwer/H
redde/d
reddingsboot/JP
regressief/Z
regs/V
rekenaars/B
resteer/G
riempiesmat/L
rigter/ACFK
rigting/ACFKV
rissie/S
roer/ACJKSVg
rubberboot/JP
ruig/HLT
rytyd/C
saagraam/FP
saaklikheid/M
saampersbaar/HOP
saamsmelt/h
sagaardig/EH
sakramenteel/P
sangwysie/GS
seep/CGPV
seismograaf/Z
seisoenarbeid/r
seringe/B
ses/CNO
seëprale/d
sien/ACEFKMUVgh
sifsel/SU
simpel/EHT
sindroom/P
sinnelik/EH
sinspeling/ES
sitters/ABCF
skeenskut/L
skeer/FMU
skeur/CEJKUgh
skiet/ABCFKMUVr
skinder/GV
skolier/E
skop/CFKMUV
skore/B
skors/Eh
skroeiende/V
skubbe/J
skudding/FK
slordig/EHTr
smartryk/ET
smelt/CFUVhr
smering/ABCES
snaar/JP
snede/BJU
snedes/U
snoep/EGHTVr
snou/AF
soortgelyk/EHS
sorgeloos/H
spataar/JP
spelle/GJS
sponserig/EHTr
spookagtig/EH
sporing/AKU
spottend/BE
spreke/d
spring/ABFJKMV
spronge/M
staan/ABCFKMUV
staatsbedryf/Z
stadsaal/P
stamvrug/L
stelbare/BV
stigtelike/O
stigters/A
stoet/EJ
stoflik/HTVr
stoom/ACFU
stoot/ACFMUV
storie/GJS
stotter/U
stralingsterapie/B
strand/GJgh
strewe/GSd
stroppie/S
stry/BFKU
subsisteem/P
suksesvol/OT
suurstofhoudend/E
sweerder/B
swye/V
sy/EKM
tagograaf/Z
tas/ABFG
tasting/ABF
tee/GHJ
teleskopeer/G
tem/Jr
tinkel/Gg
tjellis/L
toegelaat/P
toegevou/N
toepaslik/HTr
tokkel/BG
tolle/Jd
toonkamer/V
toppresteerder/S
torring/FKUV
tree/ACFJKMUV
trekkers/CF
tril/G
tronkdeur/E
turbulent/Tr
tydverdryf/Z
uitroep/h
uittand/gh
vaar/ABCJKMSU
vang/ABFKTUV
vangkraal/P
veelsydig/EHT
veilige/O
veldstoel/J
venynig/EHTr
verbluf/L
verdoof/OZ
verdraai/Ngh
verdwyn/gh
vergelyke/d
verkies/Ugh
verkieslik/HOTr
vernoem/Ngh
verorden/Ngh
versiersels/M
verslawe/d
versoete/O
vertoning/ES
vervelsel/S
ververs/gh
verwater/N
verworpe/H
vierdubbel/NV
vind/gh
vleispot/L
vlieg/ACFKMUV
voed/KMh
vogtiger/B
voorbereide/Od
voorsien/MNOr
voorspoedig/HOr
vreeslik/EHST
vul/ACKM
vyeboom/P
wals/CEr
waspoeier/KS
wassing/AEFU
waswater/FK
week/CFHPV
weeklaag/G
weerbarstig/EHTr
weerhaan/JP
welbehaaglik/EHSTr
westelik/GTr
wiege/d
wins/AM
wissel/CSUVg
worshond/EJ
wortel/BCGS
wringing/CV
wyndruif/Z
wysgerig/HO
óúd/T
